Virginia statutes. Title 51.5. Persons With Disabilities.
Chapter 8.1. Protection and Advocacy Services.

§§ 51.5-39.1 through 51.5-39.12.
Repealed by Acts 2012, c. 847, cl. 2, effective January 1, 2014.

Cross references.

For provisions pertaining to conversion of the Virginia Office for Protection and Advocacy to a nonprofit entity, see §

51.5-39.13

.

Editor’s note.

Former §§

51.5-39.1

through 51.5-39.12 established the Virginia Office for Protection and Advocacy as an independent agency. Former §

51.5-39.1

derived from 2002, c. 572; 2013, c. 571. Former § 51.5-39.2 derived from 2002, c. 572; 2003, cc. 236, 885; 2004, c. 1000; 2009, cc. 813, 840; 2012, cc. 803, 835. Former § 51.5-39.3 derived from 2002, c. 572. Former § 51.5-39.4 derived from 2002, c. 572. Former § 51.5-39.5 derived from 2002, c. 572; 2010, c. 692. Former § 51.5-39.6 derived from 2002, c. 572. Former § 51.5-39.7 derived from 2002, c. 572; 2009, cc. 813, 840; 2012, cc. 476, 507, 803, 835. Former § 51.5-39.8 derived from 2002, c. 572; 2012, cc. 476, 507. Former § 51.5-39.9 derived from 2002, c. 572. Former § 51.5-39.10 derived from 2002, c. 572; 2012, cc. 803, 835. Former § 51.5-39.11 derived from 2002, c. 572. Former § 51.5-39.12 derived from 2002, c. 572; 2009, cc. 813, 840; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

Acts 2002, c. 572, repealed former Chapter 8 (§§

51.5-36

through 51.5-39) of Title 51.5, relating to the Department for Rights of Virginians with Disabilities, and enacted this chapter, reestablishing that Department as the Virginia Office for Protection and Advocacy.

Acts 2002, c. 572, cl. 3 provides: “That the Governor is hereby requested to designate the Virginia Office for Protection and Advocacy as the agency accountable for the proper use of funds for protection of and advocacy for persons with mental, cognitive, sensory, physical, or other disabilities as determined by federal and state law and as the state protection and advocacy agency to administer the Protection and Advocacy for Individuals with Mental Illness Program, the Developmental Disabilities Program, the Client Assistance Program, the Assistive Technology Program, and other federal and state programs for the protection and advocacy of the aforementioned persons.”

Acts 2002, c. 572, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not become effective until the Governor, pursuant to the applicable federal statutes and regulations, completes the process for redesignation of the Virginia Office for Protection and Advocacy.” The Governor completed the process on July 16, 2002.

Acts 2002, c. 572, cl. 5 provides: “That the regulations of the Department for Rights of Virginians with Disabilities in effect on the effective date of this act shall continue in effect until such time as amended or repealed by the Virginia Office for Protection and Advocacy.”

Acts 2002, c. 572, cl. 6 provides: “That the Governor may transfer an appropriation or any portion thereof or any employees within an agency established, abolished or altered by the provisions of this act, or from one such agency to another, to support the changes in organization or responsibility resulting from or required by the provisions of this act.”

Acts 2002, c. 572, cl. 7 provides: “That, as of the effective date of this act, the Virginia Office for Protection and Advocacy shall be deemed the successor in interest to the Department for Rights of Virginians with Disabilities to the extent that this act transfers powers and duties. All rights, title and interest in and to any real or tangible personal property vested in the Department for Rights of Virginians with Disabilities to the extent that this act transfers powers and duties as of the effective date of this act shall be transferred to and taken as standing in the name of the Virginia Office for Protection and Advocacy.”

Acts 2012, c. 847, cl. 4 provides: “That the Director of the Virginia Office for Protection and Advocacy shall, together with the Secretary of Health and Human Resources or his designee, develop a plan for implementation of the provisions of this act and shall report on such plan to the Governor and the General Assembly no later than December 1, 2013.”

Acts 2012, c. 847, cl. 5 provides: “That any regulations adopted by the Board for Protection and Advocacy being abolished by the first enactment of this act that are in effect before January 1, 2014, are hereby repealed as of that date. The Registrar of Regulations shall take appropriate administrative action to effect the repeal of the regulations in the Virginia Administrative Code.”

§ 51.5-39.13.
Conversion of the Virginia Office for Protection and Advocacy to a nonprofit entity.

Not later than December 31, 2013, the Director, in consultation with the Board, shall establish a nonprofit entity to provide advocacy, legal, and ombudsman services to persons with disabilities. Such nonprofit entity shall be established in such a manner that the entity is in compliance with all federal law regarding a protection and advocacy system. Such nonprofit entity shall be designated as the agency to protect and advocate for the rights of persons with mental, cognitive, sensory, physical, or other disabilities and to receive federal funds on behalf of the Commonwealth of Virginia to implement the federal Protection and Advocacy for Individuals with Mental Illness Act, the federal Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act, the federal Rehabilitation Act, the Virginians with Disabilities Act (§

51.5-1

et seq.), and such other related programs as may be established in state or federal law.

Not later than January 1, 2014, the Governor shall designate the nonprofit entity established pursuant to subsection A to serve as the state’s protection and advocacy system, and such nonprofit entity shall thereafter be known as the disAbility Law Center of Virginia.

Employees of the Virginia Office for Protection and Advocacy who transition to employment with the organization designated pursuant to subsection B shall not be subject to the provisions of the Workforce Transition Act (§

2.2-3200

et seq.).

History.

2012, c. 847; 2013, c. 571.

Cross references.

As to duty of Commissioner of the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services to report critical incidents and deaths of individuals receiving services in facilities, see §

37.2-304

. As to state facility reporting requirements, see §

37.2-709

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2002, c. 572, repealed former Chapter 8 (§§

51.5-36

through 51.5-39) of Title 51.5, relating to the Department for Rights of Virginians with Disabilities, and enacted former §§

51.5-39.1

through 51.5-39.12, reestablishing that Department as the Virginia Office for Protection and Advocacy. Former §§

51.5-39.1

through 51.5-39.12 were later repealed by Acts 2012, c. 847, cl. 2, effective January 1, 2014, which enacted this section.

Acts 2012, c. 847, cl. 4 provides: “That the Director of the Virginia Office for Protection and Advocacy shall, together with the Secretary of Health and Human Resources or his designee, develop a plan for implementation of the provisions of this act and shall report on such plan to the Governor and the General Assembly no later than December 1, 2013.”

Acts 2012, c. 847, cl. 5 provides: “That any regulations adopted by the Board for Protection and Advocacy being abolished by the first enactment of this act that are in effect before January 1, 2014, are hereby repealed as of that date. The Registrar of Regulations shall take appropriate administrative action to effect the repeal of the regulations in the Virginia Administrative Code.”

Acts 2013, c. 571, cl. 4 provides: “That not later than January 1, 2014, the nonprofit organization established pursuant to §

51.5-39.13

of the Code of Virginia shall be deemed the successor in interest to all functions of the Virginia Office for Protection and Advocacy abolished pursuant to Chapter 847 of the Acts of Assembly of 2012; all rights, duties, and obligations created by a contract, memorandum of understanding, or other agreement of the Virginia Office for Protection and Advocacy abolished pursuant to Chapter 847 of the Acts of Assembly of 2012 and any actions taken on behalf of the Virginia Office for Protection and Advocacy abolished pursuant to Chapter 847 of the Acts of Assembly of 2012 shall be transferred to and taken as standing in the name of the nonprofit organization established pursuant to §

51.5-39.13

of the Code of Virginia.”

Acts 2013, c. 571, cl. 5 provides: “That not later than January 1, 2014, the nonprofit organization established pursuant to §

51.5-39.13

of the Code of Virginia shall be deemed the successor in interest to the Virginia Office for Protection and Advocacy abolished pursuant to Chapter 847 of the Acts of Assembly of 2012, to the extent that such Chapter transferred powers and duties from the Virginia Office for Protection and Advocacy to the nonprofit organization established pursuant to §

51.5-39.13

of the Code of Virginia. All right, title, and interest in and to any tangible property vested in the Virginia Office for Protection and Advocacy shall be transferred to and taken as standing in the name of the nonprofit organization established pursuant to § 51.5-39.13 of the Code of Virginia.”

Acts 2013, c. 571, cl. 6 provides: “That the Governor may transfer an appropriation equal to the amount of any cash balance remaining in any account used by the Virginia Office for Protection and Advocacy abolished pursuant to Chapter 847 of the Acts of Assembly of 2012 to the nonprofit organization established pursuant to §

51.5-39.13

of the Code of Virginia to support the changes in organization required by and resulting from Chapter 847 of the Acts of Assembly of 2012.”

Acts 2013, c. 571, cl. 7 provides: “That the Governor may transfer any financial records and personnel records of the Virginia Office for Protection and Advocacy abolished pursuant to Chapter 847 of the Acts of Assembly of 2012 to the nonprofit organization established pursuant to §

51.5-39.13

of the Code of Virginia to support the changes in organization required by and resulting from Chapter 847 of the Acts of Assembly of 2012.”

Acts 2013, c. 571, cl. 8 provides: “That the Virginia Office for Protection and Advocacy and the nonprofit organization established pursuant to §

51.5-39.13

of the Code of Virginia shall enter into an agreement for the transfer of positions and property pursuant to this act prior to January 1, 2014.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 571 substituted “disAbility Law Center of Virginia” for “Virginia Office for Protection and Advocacy” in subsection B.